Utah statutes.
77-27-28.   Hearing officer.

Any hearing pursuant to this act shall be heard by the administrator of the interstate compact for the supervision of parolees and probationers, a deputy of the administrator, or any other person authorized pursuant to the laws of this state to hear cases of alleged parole or probation violation, except that no hearing officer shall be the person making the allegation of violation.

